Nevada, session 83, AB359.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. The Legislature hereby finds that each exemption
provided by this act from any excise tax on the sale, storage, use or
consumption of tangible personal property sold at retail:
1. Will achieve a bona fide social or economic purpose and that
the benefits of the exemption are expected to exceed any adverse
effect of the exemption on the provision of services to the public by
the State or a local government that would otherwise receive
revenue from the tax from which the exemption would be granted;
and
2. Will not impair adversely the ability of the State or a local
government to pay, when due, all interest and principal on any
outstanding bonds or any other obligations for which revenue from
the tax from which the exemption would be granted was pledged.
Sec. 2. At the General Election on November 3, 2026, a
proposal must be submitted to the registered voters of this State to
amend the Sales and Use Tax Act, which was enacted by the 47th
Session of the Legislature of the State of Nevada and approved by
the Governor in 1955, and subsequently approved by the people of
this State at the General Election held on November 6, 1956.
Sec. 3. At the time and in the manner provided by law, the
Secretary of State shall transmit the proposed act to the several
county clerks, and the county clerks shall cause it to be published
and posted as provided by law.
Sec. 4. The proclamation and notice to the voters given by the
county clerks pursuant to law must be in substantially the following
form:
Notice is hereby given that at the General Election on
November 3, 2026, a question will appear on the ballot for the
adoption or rejection by the registered voters of the State of the
following proposed act:
AN ACT to amend an Act entitled “An Act to provide
revenue for the State of Nevada; providing for sales
and use taxes; providing for the manner of collection;
-
*AB359*

– 3 –
defining certain terms; providing penalties for
violation, and other matters properly relating thereto.”
approved March 29, 1955, as amended.

THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF NEVADA
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:

Section 1. The above-entitled act, being chapter 397,
Statutes of Nevada 1955, at page 762, is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to be designated as section 52.3,
immediately following section 52, to read as follows:
Sec. 52.3. There are exempted from the taxes
imposed by this act the gross receipts from sales and the
storage, use or other consumption of coins, currency and
bullion that are:
1. Manufactured in whole or in part from gold,
silver, platinum, palladium or other material;
2. Used solely as legal tender, security or commodity
in this or another state, the United States or a foreign
country; and
3. Sold based primarily on their intrinsic value as
precious material or collectible items rather than their
representative value as a medium of exchange.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2027,
and expires by limitation on December 31, 2050.
Sec. 5. The ballot page assemblies and the paper ballots to be
used in voting on the question must present the question in
substantially the following form:
Shall the Sales and Use Tax Act of 1955 be amended to
provide an exemption from the taxes imposed by this Act on
the gross receipts from the sale and the storage, use or other
consumption of coins, currency and bullion used solely as
legal tender, security or commodity and sold based primarily
on their intrinsic value as precious material or collectible
items?
 
Yes No
Sec. 6. The explanation of the question which must appear on
each paper ballot and sample ballot and in every publication and
posting of notice of the question must be in substantially the
following form:

(Explanation of Question)
The proposed amendment to the Sales and Use Tax Act of
1955 would exempt from the taxes imposed by this Act the
gross receipts from the sale and storage, use or other
-
*AB359*

– 4 –
consumption of coins, currency and bullion which are used
solely as legal tender, security or commodity in this or
another state, the United States or a foreign country and sold
based primarily on their intrinsic value as precious material or
collectible items rather than their representative value as a
medium of exchange. If this proposal is adopted, the
Legislature has provided that the Local School Support Tax
Law and certain analogous taxes on retail sales will be
amended to provide the same exemption.
Sec. 7. If a majority of the votes cast on the question is yes,
the amendment to the Sales and Use Tax Act of 1955 becomes
effective on January 1, 2027, and expires by limitation on
December 31, 2050. If less than a majority of votes cast on the
question is yes, the question fails and the amendment to the Sales
and Use Tax Act of 1955 does not become effective.
Sec. 8. All general election laws not inconsistent with this act
are applicable.
Sec. 9. Any informalities, omissions or defects in the content
or making of the publications, proclamations or notices provided for
in this act and by the general election laws under which this election
is held must be so construed as not to invalidate the adoption of the
act by a majority of the registered voters voting on the question if it
can be ascertained with reasonable certainty from the official returns
transmitted to the Office of the Secretary of State whether the
proposed amendment was adopted by a majority of those registered
voters.
Sec. 10. Chapter 374 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the
gross receipts from sales and the storage, use or other
consumption of coins, currency and bullion that are:
1. Manufactured in whole or in part from gold, silver,
platinum, palladium or other material;
2. Used solely as legal tender, security or commodity in this
or another state, the United States or a foreign country; and
3. Sold based primarily on their intrinsic value as precious
material or collectible items rather than their representative value
as a medium of exchange.
Sec. 11. 1. This section and sections 1 to 9, inclusive, of this
act become effective on October 1, 2025.
-
*AB359*

– 5 –
2. Section 10 of this act becomes effective on January 1, 2027,
and expires by limitation on December 31, 2050, only if the
proposal submitted pursuant to sections 2 to 9, inclusive, of this act
is approved by the voters at the General Election on November 3,
2026.
H
-
*AB359*